Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2361.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 732 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 732. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Consolidation or merger agreement." An agreement entered 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 into under section 737.1 (relating to advisory committee, consolidation or merger agreement and mediation) by the governing bodies of municipalities to be consolidated or merged if the consolidation or merger is initiated by petition of electors under section 735 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger without new home rule charter).* * *"Joint agreement." An agreement entered into under section 734 (relating to joint agreement of governing bodies) by the governing bodies of municipalities proposed to be consolidated or merged if the consolidation or merger is initiated by the governing bodies.* * *Section 2. Section 733(a)(3) and (b) of Title 53 are amended to read:§ 733. Procedure for consolidation or merger.(a) General rule.--Two or more municipalities may be consolidated or merged into a single municipality, whether within the same or different counties, if each of the municipalities is contiguous to at least one of the other consolidating or merging municipalities and if together the municipalities would form a consolidated or merged municipality. Consolidation or merger may be commenced by one of the following:* * *[(3) One or more of the municipalities using a joint agreement followed by approval by the electorate of the joint agreement and one or more of the municipalities using initiative of electors.(b) Combination of joint agreement and initiative.--When 20260HB2361PN3316 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consolidation or merger is commenced by a combination of joint agreements and initiatives, the initiative petition and municipal joint agreement shall be materially consistent.]* * *Section 3. Section 734(a), (b)(10) and (c) of Title 53 are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 734. Joint agreement of governing bodies.(a) [General rule] Form.--The governing body of each municipality proposed to be consolidated or merged shall enter into a joint agreement [under the official seal of each municipality] by ordinance to consolidate or merge into one municipality.(b) Elements.--The joint agreement shall include, but not be limited to:* * *(10) The common administration and enforcement of ordinances enforced uniformly within the consolidated or merged municipality and the interim processing of land use applications and approvals.(c) Transitional planning committee.--In preparing and adopting a joint agreement, the governing bodies of the municipalities may appoint a transitional planning committee [composed of residents of the respective municipalities, including not more than one of whom may be a member of the governing body of each municipality,] to study and make recommendations to the governing bodies regarding transitional plans and schedules, common administration and uniform enforcement of ordinances, consolidation and merger of departments and staff and other matters of concern to the 20260HB2361PN3316 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governing bodies. [The transitional planning committee, if created, shall continue for a maximum of six months after the effective date of the consolidation or merger to advise the new governing body of the consolidated or merged municipality on merging budgets, staffing and operations.] No later than 60 days after certification of a favorable vote on consolidation or merger, the governing bodies shall establish and appoint members of a transitional planning committee if one has not already been established.(d) Composition.--The transitional planning committee, regardless of when established, shall consist of the following members:(1) One member of the governing body of each municipality, appointed by the governing body.(2) One resident of each municipality, appointed by the governing body, who is not a member of the governing body, an appointed officer of the municipality or an employee of the municipality.(3) One employee of each municipality, appointed by the governing body. If a municipality has no employee who is not also a member of the governing body, the governing body shall appoint an additional resident under paragraph (2) in lieu of an employee under this paragraph.(4) One additional resident of an affected municipality, appointed by mutual agreement of the members appointed under paragraph (1). If the members appointed under paragraph (1) cannot reach mutual agreement, the members shall draw lots to determine which resident shall be appointed. COURT OF COMMON PLEAS SHALL APPOINT THE ADDITIONAL MEMBER WHO MUST BE A RESIDENT OF AN AFFECTED MUNICIPALITY.20260HB2361PN3316 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) One nonvoting representative appointed by the Secretary of Community and Economic Development.(6) A chairperson elected by majority vote of the transitional planning committee from among the membership of the transitional planning committee.(e) Continuation.--The transitional planning committee, regardless of when it was established, shall continue until six months after the effective date of the consolidation or merger to advise the new governing body of the consolidated or merged municipality on merging budgets, staffing and operations.Section 4. Section 735.1(k)(3)(iii)(D) of Title 53 is amended to read:§ 735.1. Initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger with new home rule charter.* * *(k) Function and duty of commission.--* * *(3) If a new home rule charter is found to be the most advisable form of government for the proposed consolidated or merged municipality, the commission shall:* * *(iii) Prepare and suggest for adoption by the governing body of the newly consolidated or merged municipality recommendations concerning:* * *(D) Ordinances to be uniformly enforced throughout the consolidated or merged municipality, which may be adopted by the new governing body of the consolidated or merged municipality at its organizational meeting and the interim processing of 20260HB2361PN3316 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 land use applications and approvals, provided that codification of all ordinances shall be completed as specified in section 740 (relating to procedures).* * *Section 5. Section 736 of Title 53 is amended by adding a subsection to read: § 736. Conduct of referenda.* * * (d) Filing.--The governing bodies of the municipalities approved for consolidation or merger shall file copies of the following documents as follows:(1) Within 30 days after certification by the county board of elections of approval by the electorate, the governing bodies shall file a copy of the joint agreement under section 734 or the final report of the home rule study commission under section 735.1 with the Department of Community and Economic Development, the Department of Transportation, the Governor's Office of Policy Development or its successor, the Department of Education, the Department of State, the State Tax Equalization Board, the United States Postal Service, the Legislative Data Processing Center, the court of common pleas, the board of county commissioners and the county board of elections of the county in which an affected municipality is located or, if an affected municipality is located in more than one county, of each affected county.(2) Within 30 days after adoption by ordinance of the consolidation or merger agreement under section 737.1 (relating to advisory committee, consolidation or merger agreement and mediation), the governing bodies shall file a 20260HB2361PN3316 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 copy of the agreement with the entities specified in paragraph (1).Section 6. Section 737 of Title 53 is repealed:[§ 737. Consolidation or merger agreement.(a) Form.--Upon favorable action by the electorate on consolidation or merger, in cases where consolidation or merger was initiated by petition of electors under section 735 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger without new home rule charter), the governing bodies of the municipalities to be consolidated or merged shall meet as deemed necessary after the certification of the favorable vote and shall within one year after certification enter into a consolidation or merger agreement as follows:(1) If the governing body, or part of the governing body, of the consolidated or merged municipality is to be elected on a district or ward basis, the agreement shall set forth the district or ward boundaries and the district or ward designation, by number, and the number of members of the municipal governing body to be elected from each district or ward. The boundaries of the districts or wards shall be established to achieve substantially equal representation.(2) The agreement shall set forth terms for:(i) The disposition of the existing assets of each municipality.(ii) The liquidation of the existing indebtedness of each municipality.(iii) The assumption, assignment and disposition of the existing liabilities of each municipality, either jointly, separately or in certain defined proportions, by separate rates of taxation within each of the constituent 20260HB2361PN3316 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipalities until consolidation or merger becomes effective pursuant to section 738 (relating to effectuation of consolidation or merger).(3) The agreement shall set forth the governmental organization of the consolidated or merged municipality insofar as it concerns elected officers and shall contain a transitional plan and schedule applicable to elected officers.(4) The agreement shall provide for common administration and uniform enforcement of ordinances within the consolidated or merged municipality.(5) The agreement shall also provide, consistent with existing law, for the implementation of a uniform tax system throughout the consolidated or merged municipality which shall provide the revenue necessary to fund required municipal services.(6) The agreement shall mandate full implementation of the consolidation or merger plan within four years following the date of certification.(b) Filing.--Within 30 days following certification of electorate approval by the county boards of election, a copy of the consolidation or merger agreement under this section or the joint agreement under section 734 (relating to joint agreement of governing bodies) shall be filed with the Department of Community and Economic Development, the Department of Transportation, the Governor's Office of Policy Development or its successor, the Department of Education, the State Tax Equalization Board and the Legislative Data Processing Committee. A copy shall also be filed with the court of common pleas and the board of county commissioners of the county or 20260HB2361PN3316 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 counties in which municipalities affected are located.]Section 7. Title 53 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 737.1. Advisory committee, consolidation or merger agreement and mediation.(a) Advisory committee.--Upon favorable action by the electorate on consolidation or merger, if the consolidation or merger was initiated by petition of electors under section 735 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger without new home rule charter), the governing bodies of the municipalities to be consolidated or merged shall meet within 60 days after certification of the favorable vote to establish an advisory committee. The advisory committee shall consist of the following members:(1) One member of the governing body of each municipality, appointed by the governing body.(2) One resident of each municipality who is not a member of the governing body, an appointed officer of the municipality or an employee of the municipality, appointed by the governing body.(3) One employee of each municipality, appointed by the governing body. If a municipality has no employee who is not also a member of the governing body, the governing body shall appoint an additional resident under paragraph (2) in lieu of an employee under this paragraph.(4) One additional resident of an affected municipality, appointed by mutual agreement of the members appointed under paragraph (1). If the members appointed under paragraph (1) cannot reach mutual agreement, the members shall draw lots to determine which resident shall be appointed. COURT OF COMMON PLEAS SHALL APPOINT THE ADDITIONAL MEMBER WHO MUST BE A 20260HB2361PN3316 - 9 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RESIDENT OF AN AFFECTED MUNICIPALITY.(5) One nonvoting representative appointed by the Secretary of Community and Economic Development.(6) A chairperson elected by majority vote of the advisory committee from among the membership of the advisory committee.(b) Consolidation or merger agreement.--Within five months after the establishment of the advisory committee, the advisory committee shall present to the governing bodies of the municipalities a consolidation or merger agreement. The agreement shall include all of the following:(1) Each matter required to be specified in the petition under section 735(c)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7).(2) If the governing body, or a part of the governing body, of the consolidated or merged municipality is to be elected on a district or ward basis, the district or ward boundaries, the district or ward designation by number and the number of members of the municipal governing body to be elected from each district or ward. The boundaries of the districts or wards shall be established to achieve substantially equal representation.(3) Terms for all of the following:(i) The disposition of the existing assets of each municipality.(ii) The liquidation of the existing indebtedness of each municipality.(iii) The assumption, assignment and disposition of the existing liabilities of each municipality, either jointly, separately or in certain defined proportions, by separate rates of taxation within each constituent 20260HB2361PN3316 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality until consolidation or merger becomes effective under section 738 (relating to effectuation of consolidation or merger).(4) The governmental organization of the consolidated or merged municipality insofar as it concerns elected officers and a transitional plan and schedule applicable to elected officers.(5) The common administration and uniform enforcement of ordinances within the consolidated or merged municipality and the interim processing of land use applications and approvals.(6) The implementation, consistent with existing State law, of a uniform tax system throughout the consolidated or merged municipality that provides the revenue necessary to fund required municipal services.(7) Full implementation of the consolidation or merger plan within four years after certification of the favorable vote.(c) Failure to reach agreement.--If the advisory committee is unable to approve a consolidation or merger agreement by majority vote within the time period under subsection (b), the advisory committee shall issue a report within that time period specifying both of the following:(1) The matters under subsection (b) approved by a majority of the advisory committee.(2) The matters for which agreement was not reached, including competing approaches to those matters.(d) Acceptance or rejection by ordinance.--Within one year after certification of favorable action by the electorate, the governing body of each municipality to be consolidated or merged 20260HB2361PN3316 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall, by ordinance, accept or reject the consolidation or merger agreement presented by the advisory committee. Adoption of an ordinance under this subsection shall be subject to an action in mandamus. If a governing body rejects the agreement in whole or in part, the ordinance shall specify the provisions of the agreement that the governing body finds objectionable and describe how those provisions would fail to provide for an orderly transition to the new government or would be inconsistent with this title or other State law.(e) Mediation.--If the advisory committee issues a report under subsection (c) or if a governing body rejects the consolidation or merger agreement in whole or in part under subsection (d), the chairperson of the advisory committee shall petition the court of common pleas to provide for mediation of the agreement. Upon petition, the court shall appoint three impartial individuals who reside within the county or counties in which the municipalities are located, but not within the municipalities, as mediators. The mediators shall coordinate with the governing bodies and the advisory committee and shall limit review and mediation to only those matters in dispute identified in the report under subsection (c) or in an ordinance under subsection (d). After notice to interested parties and publication of the petition as directed by the court, the mediators shall hold a hearing and review the proposed consolidation or merger agreement. No later than 90 days after the petition is filed, a majority of the mediators shall submit to the court a report and recommendations for a consolidation or merger agreement. Within 30 days after submission of the report, the court shall confirm the report unless the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that a provision recommended in 20260HB2361PN3316 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the report would fail to provide for an orderly transition to the new government or would be inconsistent with this title or other law. The court may direct publication of the availability of the report and require notice to interested parties.(f) Exceptions.--Within 30 days after the filing of the report under subsection (e), an interested person or political subdivision may file exceptions to the report. The court shall schedule a hearing on the exceptions and provide notice of the hearing. After the hearing, the court may sustain or dismiss the exceptions and confirm the report or refer the report back to the same or new mediators for another report.(g) Final adoption.--Within 60 days after final adjudication of a mediation under subsection (e), the governing body of each municipality to be consolidated or merged shall adopt the consolidation or merger agreement by ordinance. Notwithstanding any other law, adoption of an ordinance under this subsection shall be subject to an action in mandamus.Section 8. Sections 738, 740(a) and 741(a) of Title 53 are amended to read:§ 738. Effectuation of consolidation or merger.Municipalities consolidated or merged shall continue to be governed as before consolidation or merger until the date stipulated in the transitional plan and schedule provided for in sections 734 (relating to joint agreement of governing bodies) and [737 (relating to consolidation or merger agreement)] 737.1 (relating to advisory committee, consolidation or merger agreement and mediation), or the transitional plan provided for by a study commission pursuant to section 735.1 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger with new home rule charter). Subject to the provisions of section 20260HB2361PN3316 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 735.1(q), new officials required to be elected shall take office on the first Monday of January following the municipal election designated in the transitional plan and schedule. At that municipal election, the necessary officers of the consolidated or merged municipality shall be elected in accordance with the terms of the general law affecting municipalities of the kind or class of the consolidated or merged municipality or, in case of a consolidated or merged municipality operating under a home rule charter or optional plan of government, in accordance with the charter or optional plan or with general law affecting home rule or optional plan municipalities, as applicable. The officers elected at that municipal election shall be elected for terms of office under the plan and schedule set forth in the consolidation or merger agreement authorized by section 734 or [737] 737.1, or the transitional plan provided for by a commission pursuant to section 735.1, as the case may be. They shall take office as officers of the consolidated or merged municipality on the first Monday of January following the municipal election at which they were elected, and upon assumption of office, the consolidated or merged municipality shall begin to function and the former municipalities consolidated or merged into it shall be abolished.§ 740. Procedures.(a) Ordinance book.--After consolidation becomes effective, a new ordinance book shall be used by the municipality, and, except for a municipality consolidated or merged under section 735.1 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger with new home rule charter), the first document to be recorded in it shall be the [consolidation agreement.] joint agreement under section 734 (relating to joint agreement of 20260HB2361PN3316 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governing bodies) or the consolidation or merger agreement under section 737.1 (relating to advisory committee, consolidation or merger agreement and mediation), as applicable . * * *§ 741. Court review of transitional plan.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), after the approval of a referendum pursuant to section 736 (relating to conduct of referenda) and the adoption of a transitional plan and schedule under section 734 (relating to joint agreement of governing bodies) or 737.1 (relating to advisory committee, consolidation or merger agreement and mediation), any person who is a resident of a municipality to be consolidated or merged may petition the court of common pleas to order the appropriate municipal governing bodies to[:(1) implement the terms of a transitional plan and schedule adopted pursuant to section 734 (relating to joint agreement of governing bodies) or 737 (relating to consolidation or merger agreement); or(2) adopt or amend a transitional plan or schedule if the court finds that the failure to do so will result in the unreasonable perpetuation of the separate forms and classifications of government existing in the affected municipalities prior to the approval of the referendum.] implement the terms of the transitional plan and schedule.* * *Section 9. Title 53 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 742. Extension of deadlines.Upon petition of the chairperson elected under section 734(d)(6) (relating to joint agreement of governing bodies) or 737.1(a)(6) (relating to advisory committee, consolidation or 20260HB2361PN3316 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 merger agreement and mediation), the court of common pleas may extend a time period under this subchapter. The court may grant an extension only for the minimum period necessary to reasonably ensure completion of the consolidation or merger.§ 743. Grant qualification.(a) Eligibility.--To the extent not prohibited by Federal law, a consolidated or merged municipality shall retain eligibility for a grant pending, available or authorized for a municipality consolidated or merged under this subchapter to the extent the municipality would have been eligible for the grant notwithstanding the consolidation or merger. Eligibility under this subsection shall continue for not more than seven years after certification of the favorable vote on consolidation or merger. Eligibility under this subsection shall also apply to a department, agency or authority of a municipality consolidated or merged under this subchapter. A consolidated or merged municipality and its departments, agencies and authorities may not receive more than one award under the same grant program for the same purpose solely by reason of the consolidation or merger.(b) Grants previously awarded.--To the extent not prohibited by Federal law:(1) A municipality consolidated or merged under this subchapter, and a department, agency or authority of the municipality, shall not be disqualified from receiving the proceeds of a grant awarded before the consolidation or merger solely because of the consolidation or merger.(2) A grant awarded to a volunteer fire department or other person doing business within, for or on behalf of a municipality consolidated or merged under this subchapter 20260HB2361PN3316 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall not be interrupted, abbreviated or rescinded solely because of the consolidation or merger.Section 10. This act shall apply to a consolidation or merger commenced under 53 Pa.C.S. § 733(a) on or after the effective date of this section.Section 11. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2361PN3316 - 17 - 123456